Louisiana, session 2026, HB991.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 894.1(B)(33) is hereby amended and
reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 894.1(B)(34) is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
Art. 894.1. Sentencing guidelines; generally
* * *
B. The following grounds, while not controlling the discretion of the court,
shall be accorded weight in its determination of suspension of sentence or probation:
* * *
(33)(a) The defendant is a victim of domestic abuse, human trafficking,
trafficking of children, or sexual assault and there was a rational, causal, and
temporally proximate connection between the victimization of the defendant and the
instant offense.
(b) The court shall order a presentence investigation pursuant to Article 875
if a finding is made pursuant to this Subparagraph.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1373 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 991
(34) Any other relevant mitigating circumstance.
* * *